Illinois, session 104th, SB3681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Protect the Great Lakes Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) An International Joint Commission Great Lakes 8    Science Advisory Board Microplastics Work Group was 9    established in 2022 to address growing concerns over the 10    presence and potential ecological effects of microplastics 11    in the transboundary waters of the Great Lakes.12        (2) Laboratory toxicity tests show that microplastics 13    can adversely affect species relevant to the Great Lakes. 14    Several laboratory studies have found effects of 15    microplastics on organisms including tissue inflammation, 16    changes to gene expression, reduced growth and feeding, 17    decreased reproductive output, and increased mortality. 18    Plastics can also leach additives or sorb contaminants 19    present in the environment and may potentially act as 20    vectors for other toxic compounds.21        (3) Most of what is known about PFAS comes from 22    studies of humans and animals exposed to perfluorooctanoic 23    acid and perfluorooctanesulfonic acid. PFOA and PFOS are   SB3681- 2 -LRB104 19275 BDA 32721 b1    no longer produced in the United States, but they continue 2    to be detected in human blood, along with other PFAS. 3    Exposure to PFAS in contaminated drinking water may result 4    in the following health effects:5            (A) increased cholesterol levels;6            (B) liver damage;7            (C) increased risk for thyroid disease;8            (D) high blood pressure or preeclampsia during 9        pregnancy;10            (E) small decreases in infant birth weights;11            (F) decreased vaccine response in children; and12            (G) increased risk of cancers.13        (4) A regionally coordinated monitoring program 14    following harmonized methods and adhering to consistent 15    reporting guidelines should be implemented to inform 16    ecological risk assessment, mitigation, and management of 17    microplastic and PFAS in the Great Lakes. 18    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    "District" means the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 20District of Greater Chicago.21    "Microplastic" means a plastic particle less than 5 mm in 22size.23    "Perfluoroalkyl substance or polyfluoroalkyl substance" or 24"PFAS" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals 25containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.   SB3681- 3 -LRB104 19275 BDA 32721 b1    Section 15. Pilot program. At the start of each month, the 2District shall test for the presence of microplastics and PFAS 3in Lake Michigan and the Environmental Protection Agency shall 4test for the presence of microplastics and PFAS in the 5Illinois drinking water system. At the end of each month, the 6District shall submit a report to the Environmental Protection 7Agency containing the test results taken at the start of the 8month. After one year of testing and reporting, the District 9and Environmental Protection Agency shall submit a report to 10the General Assembly. 11    Section 20. Working group. The Environmental Protection 12Agency and the Department of Public Health shall establish an 13intergovernmental working group. The group shall meet at the 14beginning of every month to (i) address the effects of 15microplastic and PFAS water pollution on public health and 16(ii) find ways to eliminate microplastic and PFAS water 17pollution. Every 6 months, the group shall submit a report to 18the General Assembly containing recommendations to eliminate 19microplastic and PFAS water pollution. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2027.